src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-tähkä_01
 SG-NOM   ; ! mato
:%>%^WCns SG-GEN   ; ! maon
 SG-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! mattooa
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! mattoo
 SG-INE   ; ! tähääs
 SG-ELA   ; ! maost
 SG-ALL   ; ! maolle
 SG-ADE   ; ! maool
 SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
 SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
 SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! mattoon
 SG-EXE  ; ! mattoon
 SG-COM   ; ! maanka
! Plural
 PL-NOM   ; ! tähät
 PL-PAR_A   ; ! tähkiä
 PL-ILL_V   ; ! tähkii
 Oblique-Plural_V ;
 PL-GEN   ; ! ossiin
 PL-INE   ; ! formis
 PL-ELA   ; ! matoloist
 PL-ALL   ; ! matoloille
 PL-ADE   ; ! matoloil
 PL-ABL   ; ! matoloilt
 PL-TRA   ; ! matoloiks
 PL-ESS_Vn   ; ! matoloinna
 PL-EXE  ; ! matoloint
 PL-COM  ; ! maanka
 PL-INS  ; ! lehminee

! tähti (IX)
LEXICON N-tähti
+N+Der/tOin:e%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-tähti_01 ;

LEXICON N-tähti_01
+Sg+Nom:i     #   ; ! tähti
+Sg+Gen:e%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! maon
+Sg+Par:e%>%^LCns%^LVwsAÄ1	#   ; ! mattooa
+Sg+Ill:e%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! mattoo
:e SG-INE   ; ! maooz
+Sg+Ela:e%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:e%>%^WCnslle    #   ; ! maolle
:e SG-ADE   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:e%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:e%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:e%>%^LCns%^LVwsnnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Exe:e%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Com:%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
+Pl:  lOi-Pl ;
+Pl+Nom:e%>%^WCnst     #   ; ! maot

LEXICON N-varsi
 N-käsi ;
+N:s     SG-NOM   ; ! vars

! voosi:voo
LEXICON N-voosi
+N+Sg+Ess:nnAÄ1 K ; ! voonna 
+N: N-käsi_01 ;

! käsi (XI)
LEXICON N-käsi
+N+Der/tOin:te%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-käsi_01 ; 

LEXICON N-käsi_01
:si     SG-NOM   ; ! orsi
:te SG-GEN   ; ! orren
:t SG-PAR_tA  ; ! ortta
:te SG-ILL_V  ; ! ortee
:te SG-INE   ; ! orrees
:te SG-ELA   ; ! maost
:te SG-ALL   ; ! maolle
:te SG-ADE   ; ! maool
:te SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
:te SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
+Dial/Lauk:te SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! mattoon
+Dial/Soik:te SG-ESS_Vn   ; ! mattoon
:te SG-EXE  ; ! mattoont
+Dial/Lauk:te SG-COM   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:te PL-NOM   ; ! maot
:s PL-GEN    ; ! matoloin
:s PL-PAR_A-LCns  ;
:s PL-ILL_V   ; ! kässii
:s PL-INE   ; ! matoloiz
:s PL-ELA   ; ! matoloist
:s PL-ALL   ; ! matoloille
:s PL-ADE   ; ! matoloil
:s PL-ABL   ; ! matoloilt
:s PL-TRA  ; ! käsiks
+Dial/Lauk:s PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! matoloin
+Dial/Soik:s PL-ESS_Vn   ; ! matoloin
:s    PL-EXE   ; ! matoloint
+Dial/Lauk:s PL-COM   ; ! käsinkä

! mees:mee (??)
LEXICON N-mees
+N+Der/tOin:he%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !meehetöin
+N: N-mees_01 ; 

LEXICON N-mees_01
:s     SG-NOM   ; ! orsi
:he SG-GEN   ; ! orren
:s SG-PAR_tA  ; ! ortta
:he SG-ILL_V  ; ! ortee
:he SG-INE   ; ! orrees
:he SG-ELA   ; ! maost
:he SG-ALL   ; ! maolle
:he SG-ADE   ; ! maool
:he SG-ABL   ; ! maolt
:he SG-TRA   ; ! maoks
+Dial/Lauk:he SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! mattoon
+Dial/Soik:he SG-ESS_Vn   ; ! mattoon
:he SG-EXE  ; ! mattoont
+Dial/Lauk:he SG-COM   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:he PL-NOM   ; ! meehet
:s PL-GEN    ; ! matoloin
:s PL-PAR_A-LCns  ;
:s PL-ILL_V   ; ! kässii
:s PL-INE   ; ! matoloiz
:s PL-ELA   ; ! matoloist
:s PL-ALL   ; ! matoloille
:s PL-ADE   ; ! matoloil
:s PL-ABL   ; ! matoloilt
:s PL-TRA  ; ! käsiks
+Dial/Lauk:s PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! matoloin
+Dial/Soik:s PL-ESS_Vn   ; ! matoloin
:s    PL-EXE   ; ! matoloint
+Dial/Lauk:s PL-COM   ; ! käsinkä

! varis (XII)
LEXICON N-varis
+N+Der/tOin:kse%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !variksetoin
+N: N-varis_01 ;

LEXICON N-varis_01
:s   SG-NOM  ;
:kse SG-GEN ;
+Sg+Par:s%>t	#   ; ! varist
:s SG-PAR_tA  ;
:kse SG-ILL_V ;
!+Sg+Ill:kse%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! mattoo
:kse SG-INE ; ! variksees
:kse SG-ELA   ; ! variksest
:kse SG-ALL   ; ! varikselle
:kse SG-ADE   ; ! varikseel
:kse SG-ABL  ; ! varikselt
:kse SG-TRA   ; ! varikseks
:kse SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! variksenna
:kse SG-ESS_Vn ;
:kse SG-EXE	; !variksent
:kse SG-COM  ; ! maanka
! Plural
+Pl+Nom:kse%>%^WCnst     #   ; ! varikset
+Pl+Gen:ks%>i%>n	#   ; ! variksin
+Pl+Gen:ksi%>i%>n	#   ; ! variksiin
+Pl+Acc:kse%>%^WCnst     #   ; ! varikset
+Pl+Par:ks%>i%>AÄ1	#   ; ! variksia
+Pl+Ill:ks%>i%>%^LVws	#   ; ! variksii
:ks PL-INE   ; ! variksiis
+Pl+Ela:ks%>i%>st    #   ; ! matoloist
+Pl+All:ks%>i%>lle    #   ; ! matoloille
:ks PL-ADE ; ! variksil
+Pl+Abl:ks%>i%>lt    #   ; ! matoloilt
+Pl+Tra:ks%>i%>ks    #   ; ! matoloiks
+Pl+Ess:ks%>i%>nnAÄ1    #   ; ! variksinna
+Pl+Exe:ks%>i%>nt    #   ; ! variksinna
+Pl+Com:ks%>i%>nkAÄ1    #   ; ! mataloinka

! kärpäin:kärpäi (XIII)
LEXICON N-kärpäin
+N+Der/tOin:se%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !kärpäsetöin
+N: N-kärpäin_01 ;

LEXICON N-kärpäin_01
:n            SG-NOM  ;
:se           SG-GEN  ;
:s     	      SG-PAR_tA ; ! kärpäistä
+Sg+Par:s%>t  K   ; ! kärpäist
:se    	      SG-ILL_V   ; !
:se   	      SG-INE ; ! kärpäisees
:se    	      SG-ELA  ; ! toisest
:se    	      SG-ALL  ; !
:se    	      SG-ADE  ; ! maool
:se    	      SG-ABL  ; ! maolt
:se    	      SG-TRA  ; ! toiseks
:se 	      SG-ESS_Vn  ; ! varikseen
:se 	      SG-ESS_nnA  ; ! variksenna
:se    	      SG-EXE  ; !variksent
:se	      SG-COM  ; ! kärpäisenkä
:se	      SG-ABE  ; ! kärpäisetä
! Plural
:se     PL-NOM   ; ! kärpäiset
:s	PL-GEN   ; ! kärpäisiin
:s      PL-PAR_A   ; ! variksia
:s      PL-ILL_V   ; ! kärpäisii
:s      PL-INE   ; ! kärpäisiis
:s      PL-ELA   ; ! matoloist
:s      PL-ALL   ; ! matoloille
:s      PL-ADE   ; ! variksiil
:s      PL-ABL   ; ! matoloilt
:s      PL-TRA   ; ! matoloiks
:s      PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! variksinna
:s      PL-EXE   ; ! kärpäisint
:s      PL-COM   ; ! mataloinka
:s      PL-INS   ; ! kärpäisinee _Instruktiva_


LEXICON N-veitsi
+N+Der/tOin:tse%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-veitsi_01 ;

LEXICON N-veitsi_01
:tsi SG-NOM ; ! veitsi
:tse      	    SG-GEN  ;
:s 		    SG-PAR_tA ; ! veistä
:tse		    SG-ILL_V   ; !
:tse   	    SG-INE ; ! kärpäisees
:tse    		    SG-ELA  ; ! toisest
:tse    		    SG-ALL  ; !
:tse    	    SG-ADE  ; ! maool
:tse    		    SG-ABL  ; ! maolt
:tse    		    SG-TRA  ; ! toiseks
:tse 		    SG-ESS_Vn  ; ! varikseen
:tse 		    SG-ESS_nnA  ; ! variksenna
:tse    		    SG-EXE  ; !variksent
:tse		    SG-COM  ; ! kärpäisenkä
:tse		    SG-ABE  ; ! kärpäisetä
! Plural
:tse     PL-NOM   ; ! veitset
:ts PL-GEN  ; ! veitsiin
:ts PL-PAR_A   ; ! variksia
+Pl+Ill:s%>ii	#   ; ! kärpäisii
:ts PL-INE   ; ! kärpäisiis
:ts PL-ELA   ; ! matoloist
:ts PL-ALL   ; ! matoloille
:ts PL-ADE   ; ! variksiil
:ts PL-ABL   ; ! matoloilt
:ts PL-TRA   ; ! matoloiks
:ts PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! variksinna
:ts PL-EXE   ; ! kärpäisint
:ts PL-COM   ; ! veitsinkä
:ts PL-INS   ; ! veitsinee


! inmihiin (XIII-b)
LEXICON N-inmihiin
+N+Der/tOin:se%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-inmihiin_01 ;

LEXICON N-inmihiin_01
:in            SG-NOM  ; !inmihiin
:se           SG-GEN  ;
:s     	      SG-PAR_tA ; ! kärpäistä
+Sg+Par:s%>t  K   ; ! kärpäist
:se    	      SG-ILL_V   ; !
:se   	      SG-INE ; ! kärpäisees
:se    	      SG-ELA  ; ! toisest
:se    	      SG-ALL  ; !
:se    	      SG-ADE  ; ! maool
:se    	      SG-ABL  ; ! maolt
:se    	      SG-TRA  ; ! toiseks
:se 	      SG-ESS_Vn  ; ! varikseen
:se 	      SG-ESS_nnA  ; ! variksenna
:se    	      SG-EXE  ; !variksent
:se	      SG-COM  ; ! kärpäisenkä
:se	      SG-ABE  ; ! kärpäisetä
! Plural
:se     PL-NOM   ; ! kärpäiset
:s	PL-GEN   ; ! kärpäisiin
:s      PL-PAR_A-LCns   ; ! variksia
:s      PL-ILL_V   ; ! kärpäisii
:s      PL-INE   ; ! kärpäisiis
:s      PL-ELA   ; ! matoloist
:s      PL-ALL   ; ! matoloille
:s      PL-ADE   ; ! variksiil
:s      PL-ABL   ; ! matoloilt
:s      PL-TRA   ; ! matoloiks
:s      PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! variksinna
:s      PL-EXE   ; ! kärpäisint
:s      PL-COM   ; ! mataloinka
:s      PL-INS   ; ! kärpäisinee _Instruktiva_

LEXICON N-meri
 N-keeli ;

! keeli (IX-b)
LEXICON N-keeli
+N+Der/tOin:e%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-keeli_01 ;
