src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
tähti:täht N-tähti  "" ;
lehti:leht N-tähti  "" ;
veitsi:vei N-veitsi  "" ;
kehitys:kehity N-varis  "" ;
harotus:harotu N-varis  "" ;
ilves:ilve N-varis  "" ;
hoomus:hoomu N-varis  "" ;
alkumerkitös:alku#merkitö N-varis  "" ;
eritys:erity N-varis  "" ;
gruppanimitös:gruppa#nimitö N-varis  "" ;
hoomautus:hoomautu N-varis  "" ;
keelikysymys:keeli#kysymy N-varis  "" ;
tapahus:tapahu N-varis  "" ;
tapahus:tapaho N-varis  "" ;
geminaattatapahus:geminaatta#tapahu N-varis  "" ;
keeli:keel N-keeli  "" ;
hiiri:hiir N-keeli  "" ;
juuri:juur N-keeli  "" ;
hooli:hool N-keeli  "" ;
hooli:huol N-keeli  "" ;
nykykeeli:nyky#keel N-keeli  "" ;
sisäpooli:sisä#pool N-keeli  "" ;
alkupooli:alku#pool N-keeli  "" ;
saari:saar N-keeli  "" ;
poolisaari:pooli#saar N-keeli  "" ;
lohi:loh N-keeli  "" ;
tuuli:tuul N-keeli  "" ;
kuusi:kuus N-keeli  "" ;
pooli:pool N-keeli  "" ;
meeli:meel N-keeli  "" ;
meri:mer N-meri  "" ;
huuli:huul N-keeli  "" ;
hiili:hiil N-keeli  "" ;
niini:niin N-keeli  "" ;
ääni:ään N-keeli  "" ;
alakeeli:ala#keel N-keeli  "" ;
naapurikeeli:naapuri#keel N-keeli  "" ;
kirjakeeli:kirja#keel N-keeli  "" ;
mees:mee N-mees  "" ;
jahtimees:jahtimee N-mees  "" ;
inmihiin:inmihi N-inmihiin  "" ;
inmihiin:ihmihi N-inmihiin  "" ;
inmihiin:inhimi N-inmihiin  "" ;
kärpäin:kärpäi N-kärpäin  "" ;
muurahain:muurahai N-kärpäin  "" ;
mehiläin:mehiläi N-kärpäin  "" ;
läns-fenniläin:läns-fenniläi N-kärpäin  "" ;
venäläin:venäläi N-kärpäin  "" ;
nimensihalliin:nimen#sihalli N-inmihiin  "" ;
nimensihalliin:nimen#sihalli N-kärpäin  "" ;
hepoin:hepoi N-kärpäin  "" ;
vokalamuuttumin:vokala#muuttumi N-kärpäin  "" ;
laukaalain:laukaalai N-kärpäin  "" ;
laukaalain:laukalai N-kärpäin  "" ;
vadjalain:vadjalai N-kärpäin  "" ;
virolain:virolai N-kärpäin  "" ;
soomalain:soomalai N-kärpäin  "" ;
karjalain:karjalai N-kärpäin  "" ;
merkitös:merkitö N-varis  "" ;
rinnoitus:rinnoitu N-varis  "" ;
kiitos:kiito N-varis  "" ;
petos:peto N-varis  "" ;
muutos:muuto N-varis  "" ;
kerros:kerro N-varis  "" ;
käsikirjutos:käsi#kirjuto N-varis  "" ;
lisämerkitös:lisä#merkitö N-varis  "" ;
nimitös:nimitö N-varis  "" ;
omintus:omintu N-varis  "" ;
teräs:terä N-varis  "" ;
jänis:jäni N-varis  "" ;
alus:alu N-varis  "" ;
kirjutos:kirjuto N-varis  "" ;
henkähös:henkähö N-varis  "" ;
sanomus:sanomu N-varis  "" ;
steeppenivaihtiimiin:steeppeni#vaihtiimi N-inmihiin  "" ;
vesi:ve N-käsi  "" ;
käsi:kä N-käsi  "" ;
voosi:voo N-voosi  "" ;
voosi:vuu N-voosi  "" ;
voosi:vuo N-voosi  "" ;
mesi:me N-käsi  "" ;
länsi:län N-käsi  "" ;
orsi:or N-varsi  "" ;
susi:su N-käsi  "" ;
sysi:sy N-käsi  "" ;
varsi:var N-varsi  "" ;
hersi:her N-varsi  "" ;
kansi:kan N-käsi  "" ;
varis:vari N-varis  "" ;
modus:modu N-varis  "" ;
parennos:parenno N-varis  "" ;
jätös:jätö N-varis  "" ;
peenennys:peenenny N-varis  "" ;
yhtehös:yhtehö N-varis  "" ;
vaihtiimistapahus:vaihtiimis#tapahu N-varis  "" ;
kysymys:kysymy N-varis  "" ;
painutos:painuto N-varis  "" ;
